src/scripts/Slovak/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2022 Darko Milosevic <daremc86@gmail.com>
# Copyright (C) 2023 Peter Vagner <pvagner@pvagner.sk>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define ProcNumChar [ %-:mínus ] ;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define UnformattedNumber [ Digit Digit^<16];
define DecimalNumber [UnformattedNumber] [Digit | [%. Digit] | [%, Digit]]+ ;
define Number DecimalNumber | UnformattedNumber;

define InsertDot %. @-> bodka || _ ;
define InsertComma %, @-> čiarka || _ ;

define Insertzeros 
[%0] -> nula || [ .#. | %, | %. | [[.#. | %, | %.] %0+]] _ ;

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> tisíc || Digit _ Digit^3 [.#. | %, | %.];

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> miliónov || Digit _ Digit^3 tisíc;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> miliárd || Digit _ Digit^3 miliónov;

define InsertTrillions 
[..] -> biliónov || Digit _ Digit^3 miliárd;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 [tisíc|miliónov|miliárd|biliónov] -> 0 ;

define Units %0:0|1:jeden|2:dva|3:tri|4:štyri|5:päť|6:šesť|7:sedem|8:osem|9:deväť;

define Teens 1:0 [%0:desať|1:jedenásť|2:dvanásť|3:trinásť|4:štrnásť|5:pätnásť|6:šestnásť|7:sedemnásť|8:osemnásť|9:devätnásť];

define Tens %0:0|2:dvadsať|3:tridsať|4:štyridsať|5:päťdesiat|6:šesťdesiat|7:sedemdesiat|8:osemdesiat|9:deväťdesiat;

define Hundreds %0:0|1:sto|2:dvesto|3:tristo|4:štyristo|5:päťsto|6:šesťsto|7:sedemsto|8:osemsto|9:deväťsto;

define UpToThousand %0:nula .P. [[(Hundreds) Teens] | [((Hundreds) Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @->;

define FixCase 
tisíc:tisíc|miliónov:milión|miliárd:miliarda|biliónov:bilión -> || jeden _ ,, 
tisíc:tisíc|miliónov:milióny|miliárd:miliardy|bilión:bilióny -> || dva|tri|štyri _  ;

define ReplaceDva 
dva -> dve || ^ _ miliardy ,,
dva -> dva || ^ _ tisíc ;

define ReplaceDvaDve 
dva -> dve || ^ .#. _ tisíc ;

define ReplaceJeden 
jeden -> jeden || ^ _ bilión ,, 
jeden -> jeden || ^ _ milión ;


define Fix31Tys 
tisíc:tisíc|
miliónov:miliónov|
miliárd:miliárd|
biliónov:biliónov -> || 
[dvadsať|tridsať|štyridsať|päťdesiat|
šesťdesiat|sedemdesiat|osemdesiat|deväťdesiat|
sto|dvesto|tristo|štyristo|päťsto|šesťsto|
sedemsto|osemsto|deväťsto] jeden _ ;

define Fix32Tys 
tisíc:tisíc|
milióny:miliónov|
miliardy:miliárd|
bilióny:biliónov -> || 
[dvadsať|tridsať|štyridsať|päťdesiat|
šesťdesiat|sedemdesiat|osemdesiat|deväťdesiat|
sto|dvesto|tristo|štyristo|päťsto|šesťsto|
sedemsto|osemsto|deväťsto] dva _ ;

define Fix33Tys 
tisíc:tisíc|
milióny:miliónov|
miliardy:miliárd|
bilióny:biliónov -> || 
[dvadsať|tridsať|štyridsať|päťdesiat|
šesťdesiat|sedemdesiat|osemdesiat|deväťdesiat|
sto|dvesto|tristo|štyristo|päťsto|šesťsto|
sedemsto|osemsto|deväťsto] tri _ ;

define Fix34Tys 
tisíc:tisíc|
milióny:miliónov|
miliardy:miliárd|
bilióny:biliónov -> || 
[dvadsať|tridsať|štyridsať|päťdesiat|
šesťdesiat|sedemdesiat|osemdesiat|deväťdesiat|
sto|dvesto|tristo|štyristo|päťsto|šesťsto|
sedemsto|osemsto|deväťsto] štyri _ ;

define RemoveOne 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %, | %.]|GroupName _ tisíc,, 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %, | %.]|GroupName _ milión,, 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %, | %.]|GroupName _ miliarda,, 
jeden -> 0 || [.#. | %, | %.]|GroupName _ bilión ; 

define ProcNumber Number .o. 
Insertzeros .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
InsertTrillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords .o. 
FixCase .o. 
ReplaceDva .o. ReplaceDvaDve .o. 
ReplaceJeden .o. 
RemoveOne .o.
Fix31Tys  .o.
Fix32Tys  .o.
Fix33Tys  .o.
Fix34Tys  .o.
InsertDot .o. InsertComma ;

regex ProcNumChar | ProcNumber;
